Utah statutes.
41-6a-523.   Persons authorized to draw blood -- Immunity from liability.

(1) (a)  Only the following, acting at the request of a peace officer, may draw blood to determine its alcohol or drug content:

(i)  a physician;

(ii)  a registered nurse;

(iii)  a licensed practical nurse;

(iv)  a paramedic;

(v)  as provided in Subsection (1)(b), emergency medical service personnel other than paramedics; or

(vi)  a person with a valid permit issued by the Department of Health under Section 26-1-30.

(b)  The Department of Health may designate by rule, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, which emergency medical service personnel, as defined in Section 26-8a-102, are authorized to draw blood under Subsection (1)(a)(v), based on their type of certification under Section 26-8a-302.

(c)  Subsection (1)(a) does not apply to taking a urine, breath, or oral fluid specimen.

(2) The following are immune from civil or criminal liability arising from drawing a blood sample from a person whom a peace officer has reason to believe is driving in violation of this chapter, if the sample is drawn in accordance with standard medical practice:

(a)  a person authorized to draw blood under Subsection (1)(a); and

(b)  if the blood is drawn at a hospital or other medical facility, the medical facility.



Amended by Chapter 267, 2012 General Session

